Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1627
Local public health department; health director; other personnel.

A local public health department shall have a health director at its head who is required to give his or her entire time to the duties of the office and such other necessary qualified full or part-time health officers, environmental health specialists, public health nurses, health educators, and clerical assistants as may be necessary to carry on the activities pertinent to the health department.

Laws 1943, c. 152, § 2, p. 554;

R.S.1943, § 71-1627;

Laws 1972, LB 1497, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 35;

Laws 2001, LB 692, § 3.